Hawaii statutes.
§346-382 Membership. (a) The Hawaii
interagency council on homelessness shall be composed of the following members
or the member's designee:

(1) Governor's coordinator on homelessness, who shall
serve as chair;

(2) Director of human
services;

(3) Administrator of the
homeless programs office of the department of human services;

(4) Director of health;

(5) Director of labor and
industrial relations;

(6) Director of public
safety;

(7) Director of business,
economic development, and tourism;

(8) Chairperson of the
Hawaiian homes commission;

(9) Adjutant general;

(10) Chairperson of the
board of trustees of the office of Hawaiian affairs;

(11) Attorney general;

(12) Superintendent of
education;

(13) Two members of the
house of representatives to be designated by the speaker of the house of
representatives, of whom one member shall be designated by the speaker of the
house of representatives to serve as an alternate member on the Hawaii
interagency council on homelessness to serve in the other member's absence;

(14) Two members of the
senate to be designated by the president of the senate, of whom one member
shall be designated by the president of the senate to serve as an alternate
member on the Hawaii interagency council on homelessness to serve in the other
member's absence;

(15) A representative of the
Hawaii public housing authority;

(16) The mayor of each
county;

(17) A representative of the
continuum of care programs in each county, to be designated by the respective
mayors;

(18) A representative of the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs who shall be requested to serve by
the governor;

(19) A representative from
the Office of Community Planning and Development, United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development, who shall be requested to serve by the governor;

(20) A representative of a
faith-based organization with interfaith relationships, to be designated by the
governor; and

(21) A representative of the business community, to be
designated by the governor.

(b) The nongovernmental members of the Hawaii
interagency council on homelessness shall serve without compensation but shall
be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the
performance of their duties.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (a)(13)
and (a)(14), if a member of the Hawaii interagency council on homelessness is
unable to attend a meeting, that member may appoint a designee to attend and to
act on the member's behalf during the meeting.

(d) Chapter 84 shall not apply to the members
of the Hawaii interagency council on homelessness. [L 2012, c 105, pt of §2; am
L 2013, c 76, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next